Utah statutes.
20A-1-509.3.   Procedure for making interim replacement.
(1)  Until the vacancy is filled as provided in Section 20A-1-509.1 or
20A-1-509.2 and the new county attorney or district attorney has qualified,
the county legislative body may appoint an interim replacement to fill the
vacant office by following the procedures and requirements of this subsection.
(a)  The county legislative body shall appoint a deputy county or district
attorney to serve as acting county or district attorney if there are at least
three deputies in the office that has the vacancy.
(b)  The county legislative body may contract with any member of the Utah
State Bar in good standing to be acting county or district attorney if:
(i)  there are not at least three deputies in the office that has the vacancy;
or
(ii)  there are three or more deputies in the office but none of the deputies
is willing to serve.
(2)  A person appointed as interim replacement under this section shall hold
office until his successor is selected and has qualified.
